Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3603
Act; applicability.

(1) The Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act shall apply to:

(a) All medicare supplement policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after April 16, 1992; and

(b) All certificates issued under group medicare supplement policies, which certificates have been delivered or issued for delivery in this state.

(2) The act shall not apply to a policy of one or more employers or labor organizations or of the trustees of a fund established by one or more employers or labor organizations, or a combination thereof, for employees or former employees, or a combination thereof, or for members or former members, or a combination thereof, of the labor organizations.

(3) Except as otherwise specifically provided in subsection (4) of section 44-3607, the act shall not be intended to prohibit or apply to insurance policies or health care benefit plans, including group conversion policies, provided to medicare eligible persons, which policies or plans are not marketed or held to be medicare supplement policies or benefit plans.

Laws 1980, LB 877, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 329, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 305, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 998, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 983, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 21;

Laws 1996, LB 969, § 4.